foma/backups/sakha_2.lexc
!!!sakha.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols GUESS+ ^NOUNGUESS ^VERBGUESS +pos +N +deriv +ag +dim1 +dim2 +dim3 +dim4 +dim5 +nmlz +instr.nom +nmlz2 +nmlz3 +dvb +dvb2 +ag.nom +num +sg +pl +case +nom +acc +part +dat +abl +ins +com +cmpr +poss +1sg +2sg +3sg +1pl +2pl +3pl



LEXICON Root

N ;
V ;

LEXICON N
GUESS+^NOUNGUESS:0^NOUNGUESS Nstem;
таба Nstem;
балык Nstem;
лекарство:эмп Nstem;
байхал Nstem;
сурук Nstem;
баай Nstem;
орон Nstem;

LEXICON V
GUESS+^VERBGUESS:0^VERBGUESS Vstem;



LEXICON Nstem

+pos+N:^ Ninfl;
+pos+N:^ NsourceDerivation;


LEXICON NAdjStem

Ninfl ;


LEXICON NsourceDerivation

VNaffix ;
NNaffix ;


LEXICON NNaffix

+deriv+ag:һыт^ Ninfl;
+deriv+dim1:чык^ ;
+deriv+dim2:ка^ Ninfl;
+deriv+dim3:чаан^ Ninfl;
+deriv+dim4:кай^ Ninfl;
+deriv+dim5:ыйа^ Ninfl;
+deriv+nmlz:был^ Ninfl;
+deriv+instr.nom:ах^ Ninfl;
+deriv+nmlz2:лаҥ^ Ninfl;
+deriv+nmlz3:лта^ Ninfl;


LEXICON VNaffix

+deriv+dvb:ыы^ Ninfl;
+deriv+dvb2:һын^ Ninfl;
+deriv+ag.nom:ааччы^ Ninfl;


LEXICON Ninfl

+num+sg:0 Ncase;
+num+pl:лар^ Ncase;


LEXICON Ncase

+case+nom:0 NPossNom;
+case+acc:ы^ #;
+case+part:та^ #;
+case+dat:га^ #;
+case+abl:тан^ #;
+case+ins:нан^ #;
+case+com:лыын^ #;
+case+cmpr:тааҕар^ #;


LEXICON NPossNom

0 #;
+poss+1sg:м^ #;
+poss+2sg:ҥ^ #;
+poss+3sg:а^ #;
+poss+1pl:быт^ #;
+poss+2pl:гыт^ #;
+poss+3pl:лара^ #;
